Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.70.040

Buildings, construction standards.

In addition to other provisions of the law granting authority and imposing duties, a code city may exercise the powers relating to providing standards for the construction of buildings as provided in chapter 70.86 RCW and shall report the issuance of building permits for new construction as required by *RCW 36.21.040 through 36.21.060.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.70.040.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 36.21.040 through 36.21.060 were repealed by 1989 c 246 s 8.